Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 12. PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT

SUBTITLE A. MUNICIPAL PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT

CHAPTER 380. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS RELATING TO MUNICIPAL PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT

Sec. 380.001. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS. (a) The governing body of a municipality may establish and provide for the administration of one or more programs, including programs for making loans and grants of public money and providing personnel and services of the municipality, to promote state or local economic development and to stimulate business and commercial activity in the municipality. For purposes of this subsection, a municipality includes an area that:

(1) has been annexed by the municipality for limited purposes; or

(2) is in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality.

(b) The governing body may:

(1) administer a program by the use of municipal personnel;

(2) contract with the federal government, the state, a political subdivision of the state, a nonprofit organization, or any other entity for the administration of a program; and

(3) accept contributions, gifts, or other resources to develop and administer a program.

(c) Any city along the Texas-Mexico border with a population of more than 500,000 may establish not-for-profit corporations and cooperative associations for the purpose of creating and developing an intermodal transportation hub to stimulate economic development. Such intermodal hub may also function as an international intermodal transportation center and may be colocated with or near local, state, or federal facilities and facilities of Mexico in order to fulfill its purpose.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 555, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 593, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 57 (H.B. 918), Sec. 1, eff. May 17, 2005.

Sec. 380.002. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT GRANTS BY CERTAIN MUNICIPALITIES. (a) A home-rule municipality with a population of more than 100,000 may create programs for the grant of public money to any organization exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of that code for the public purposes of development and diversification of the economy of the state, elimination of unemployment or underemployment in the state, and development or expansion of commerce in the state. The grants must be in furtherance of those public purposes and shall be used by the recipient as determined by the recipient's governing board for programs found by the municipality to be in furtherance of this section and under conditions prescribed by the municipality.

(b) A home-rule municipality may, under a contract with a development corporation created by the municipality under the Development Corporation Act (Subtitle C1, Title 12), grant public money to the corporation. The development corporation shall use the grant money for the development and diversification of the economy of the state, elimination of unemployment or underemployment in the state, and development and expansion of commerce in the state.

(c) The funds granted by the municipality under this section shall be derived from any source lawfully available to the municipality under its charter or other law, other than from the proceeds of bonds or other obligations of the municipality payable from ad valorem taxes.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 13.06(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 25.02, eff. Aug. 22, 1991; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 56, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.26, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 380.003. APPLICATION FOR MATCHING FUNDS FROM FEDERAL GOVERNMENT. A municipality may, as an agency of the state, provide matching funds for a federal program that requires local matching funds from a state agency to the extent state agencies that are eligible decline to participate or do not fully participate in the program.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 1051, Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 1995.

Sec. 380.004. PROVISION OF CERTAIN INFORMATION TO COMPTROLLER. (a) Not later than the 14th day after the date of entering into, amending, or renewing an agreement authorized by this chapter, a municipality shall submit to the comptroller the information described by Section 403.0246(c), Government Code, and any other information the comptroller considers necessary to operate and update the database described by that section.

(b) A municipality shall transmit the information required by Subsection (a) in a form and manner prescribed by the comptroller.

(c) If a municipality submits an agreement to the comptroller under this section and maintains an Internet website, the municipality shall provide on the website a direct link to the location of the agreement information published on the comptroller's Internet website.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 208 (H.B. 2404), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.